Utah statutes.
35A-7-105.   Requirements of the new hire registry.

(1)  Within five business days after receiving information described in Section 35A-7-104, the department shall:

(a)  enter the information into the registry;

(b)  conduct an automated comparison of the social security numbers reported by employers and the social security numbers appearing in the records of the Office of Recovery Services beginning May 1, 1998; and

(c)  when an information comparison reveals a positive match between an individual's social security number and the child support records, provide the following information to the Office of Recovery Services:

(i)  the name, address, and social security number of the individual; and

(ii)  the name, address, and federal tax number of the individual's employer.

(2)  Beginning May 1, 1998, within two business days after information described in Section 35A-7-104 is entered into the registry, matched, and reported to the Office of Recovery Services, the Office of Recovery Services shall transmit a notice to the employer directing the employer to withhold the employee's wages in an amount equal to the employee's monthly or other periodic support obligation.

(3)  Within three business days after information described in Section 35A-7-104 is entered into the registry, the department shall furnish that information to the National Directory of New Hires.

(4)  The department shall, on a quarterly basis, furnish to the National Directory of New Hires extracts of the reports required under the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 303(a)(6), to be made to the Secretary of Labor concerning the wages and unemployment compensation paid to individuals by such dates, in such format, and containing such information as specified in federal regulations.

(5)  State agencies operating employment security and workers' compensation programs may have access to the information in the registry for purposes of administering those programs.



Enacted by Chapter 232, 1997 General Session

